South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-13-360 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-13-360.  The ballots shallBallots also must contain a place for voters to write in the name of any other another person for whom they wish to vote except on ballots for the election of the President and Vice President. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----